test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-2_gt-norm.yaml
  Adjective - fijnes: # LINES
    fijnes+A+Attr: [fijnna, fijna]
    fijnes+A+Sg+Nom: fijnes
    fijnes+A+Sg+Gen: fijnnása
    fijnes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: fijnnásabbo
    fijnes+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [fijnáp, fijnnásap, fijnnásup]
    fijnes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: fijnnásamos
    fijnes+A+Der/Superl+A+Attr: [fijnámus, fijnnásamos]
    fijnes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: fijnnásappot
    fijnes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: fijnnásabmusit
    fijnes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: fijnnásappusj
    fijnes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: fijnnásapputjit
    fijnes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: fijnnásit
    fijnes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [fijnavuohta, fijnnavuohta]

  Adjective - goastes: # OAMES
    goastes+A+Attr: goasste
    goastes+A+Sg+Nom: goastes
    goastes+A+Sg+Gen: goasstása
    goastes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: goasstásabbo
    goastes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: goasstásamos
    goastes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: goasstásappot
    goastes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: goasstásabmusit
    goastes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: goasstásappusj
    goastes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: goasstásapputjit
    goastes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: goasstásit
    goastes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: goasstevuohta

  Adjective - gåjkes: # OAMES
    gåjkes+A+Attr: gåjkke
    gåjkes+A+Sg+Nom: gåjkes
    gåjkes+A+Sg+Gen: gåjkkåsa
    gåjkes+A+Sg+Ine: gåjkkåsin
    gåjkes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gåjkkåsabbo
    gåjkes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gåjkkåsamos
    gåjkes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gåjkkåsappot
    gåjkes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gåjkkåsabmusit
    gåjkes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: gåjkkåsappusj
    gåjkes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gåjkkåsapputjit
    gåjkes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gåjkkåsit
    gåjkes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gåjkkevuohta

  Adjective - bitjes: # OAMES and GIMES, LEXATTR
    bitjes+A+Attr: [bitjes, bihtja]
    bitjes+A+Sg+Nom: bitjes
    bitjes+A+Sg+Gen: bihtjása
    bitjes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: bihtjásabbo
    bitjes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: bihtjásamos
    bitjes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bihtjásappot
    bitjes+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bihtjásabmusit
    bitjes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:  bihtjásappusj
    bitjes+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bihtjásapputjit
    bitjes+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bihtjásit
    bitjes+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [bihtjavuohta, bitjesvuohta]

  Adjective - vigák: # BASSTEL
    vigák+A+Attr: [vigágis, vigák]
    vigák+A+Sg+Nom: vigák
    vigák+A+Sg+Com: vigágijn
    vigák+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: []
    vigák+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: []
    vigák+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: []
    vigák+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    vigák+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    vigák+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [vigágisvuohta, vigákvuohta]

  Adjective - sihkar: # BASSTEL
    sihkar+A+Attr: sihkaris
    sihkar+A+Sg+Nom: sihkar
    sihkar+A+Sg+Com: sihkarijn
    sihkar+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: sihkarabbo
    sihkar+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: sihkaramos
    sihkar+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: sihkarappusj
    sihkar+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sihkarapputjit
    sihkar+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: sihkarit
    sihkar+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: sihkarisvuohta

  Adjective - roahkok: # BASSTEL
    roahkok+A+Attr: roahkogis
    roahkok+A+Sg+Nom: roahkok
    roahkok+A+Sg+Ine: roahkogin
    roahkok+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: roahkogabbo
    roahkok+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: roahkogamos
    roahkok+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: roahkogappot
    roahkok+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: roahkogabmusit
    roahkok+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: roahkogappusj
    roahkok+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: roahkogapputjit
    roahkok+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: roahkogit
    roahkok+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: roahkogisvuohta

  Adjective - ridák: # 
    ridák+A+Attr: [ridák, ridágis]
    ridák+A+Sg+Nom: ridák
    ridák+A+Sg+Acc: ridágav
    ridák+A+Ess: ridágin
    ridák+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: ridágabbo
    ridák+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: ridágamos
    ridák+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ridágappot
    ridák+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ridágabmusit
    ridák+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: ridágappusj
    ridák+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ridágapputjit
    ridák+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: ridágit
    ridák+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [ridákvuohta, ridágisvuohta]

  Adjective - låssåk: # BASSTEL
    låssåk+A+Attr: låssågis
    låssåk+A+Sg+Nom: låssåk
    låssåk+A+Sg+Ine: låssågin
    låssåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: låssågabbo
    låssåk+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: låssågamos
    låssåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: låssågappot
    låssåk+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: låssågabmusit
    låssåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: låssågappusj
    låssåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: låssågapputjit
    låssåk+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: låssågit
    låssåk+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: låssågisvuohta

  Adjective - gæhppat: # BASSTEL
    gæhppat+A+Attr: [gæhppadis, gähppadis]
    gæhppat+A+Sg+Nom: [gæhppat, gähppat]
    gæhppat+A+Sg+Ine: [gæhppadin, gähppadin]
    gæhppat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gæhppadabbo, gähppadabbo]
    gæhppat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gæhppadamos, gähppadamos]
    gæhppat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gæhppadappot, gähppadappot]
    gæhppat+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gæhppadabmusit, gähppadabmusit]
    gæhppat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [gæhppadappusj, gähppadappusj]
    gæhppat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gæhppadapputjit, gähppadapputjit]
    gæhppat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gæhppadit, gähppadit]
    gæhppat+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [gæhppadisvuohta, gähppadisvuohta]

  Adjective - ruoppsat: #
    ruoppsat+A+Attr: ruoppsis
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Nom: ruoppsat
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Com: ruoppsadijn

  Adjective - asit: # 
    asit+A+Attr: asidis
    asit+A+Sg+Nom: asit
    asit+A+Sg+Ine: asidin

  Adjective - gålisj: # BASSTEL
    gålisj+A+Attr: gålitjis
    gålisj+A+Sg+Nom: gålisj
    gålisj+A+Sg+Ine: gålitjin
    gålisj+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gålitjabbo
    gålisj+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gålitjamos
    gålisj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gålitjappot
    gålisj+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gålitjabmusit
    gålisj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: gålitjappusj
    gålisj+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gålitjapputjit
    gålisj+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gålitjit
    gålisj+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gålitjisvuohta

  Adjective - giddis: # BASSTEL
    giddis+A+Attr: [giddisis, giddis]
    giddis+A+Sg+Nom: giddis
    giddis+A+Sg+Ine: giddisin
    giddis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: giddisabbo
    giddis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: giddisamos
    giddis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: giddisappot
    giddis+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: giddisabmusit
    giddis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: giddisappusj
    giddis+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: giddisapputjit
    giddis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: giddisit
    giddis+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [giddisvuohta, giddisisvuohta]

  Adjective - gavvar: # BASSTEL
    gavvar+A+Attr: gavvaris
    gavvar+A+Sg+Nom: gavvar
    gavvar+A+Sg+Ine: gavvarin
    gavvar+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gavvarabbo
    gavvar+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gavvaramos
    gavvar+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gavvarappot
    gavvar+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gavvarabmusit
    gavvar+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: gavvarappusj
    gavvar+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gavvarapputjit
    gavvar+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gavvarit
    gavvar+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gavvarisvuohta

  Adjective - dågun: # BASSTEL
    dågun+A+Attr: dågunis
    dågun+A+Sg+Nom: dågun
    dågun+A+Sg+Ine: dågunin
    dågun+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dågunabbo
    dågun+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: dågunamos
    dågun+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dågunappot
    dågun+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dågunabmusit
    dågun+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: dågunappusj
    dågun+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dågunapputjit
    dågun+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dågunit
    dågun+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: dågunisvuohta

  Adjective - bargál: # BASSTEL
    bargál+A+Attr: [bargális, bargánis]
    bargál+A+Sg+Nom: [bargál, bargán]
    bargál+A+Sg+Ine: [bargálin, bargánin]
    bargál+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [bargálabbo, bargánabbo]
    bargál+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [bargálamos, bargánamos]
    bargál+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [bargálappot, bargánappot]
    bargál+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [bargálabmusit, bargánabmusit]
    bargál+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [bargálappusj, bargánappusj]
    bargál+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [bargálapputjit, bargánapputjit]
    bargál+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [bargálit, bargánit]
    bargál+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [bargálisvuohta, bargánisvuohta]

  Adjective - dabár: # DABÁR
    dabár+A+Attr: dabáris
    dabár+A+Sg+Nom: dabár
    dabár+A+Sg+Gen: dahpara
    dabár+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dahparabbo
    dabár+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: dahparamos
    dabár+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: dahparappusj
    dabár+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dahparapputjit
    dabár+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dahparit
    dabár+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: dabárisvuohta

  Adjective - gutjel: # DABÁR
    gutjel+A+Attr: gutjelis
    gutjel+A+Sg+Nom: gutjel
    gutjel+A+Sg+Gen: guhtjála

  Adjective - jerrat: # 
    jerrat+A+Attr: jierris
    jerrat+A+Sg+Nom: jerrat
    jerrat+A+Sg+Gen: jerrada

  Adjective - sjkebtjas: # 
    sjkebtjas+A+Attr: [sjkæbttja, sjkäbttja]
    sjkebtjas+A+Sg+Nom: sjkebtjas
    sjkebtjas+A+Sg+Gen: [sjkæbttjasa, sjkäbttjasa] 

  Adjective - gærgos: # 
    gærgos+A+Sg+Nom: [gærgos, gärgos]
    gærgos+A+Sg+Gen: [gærggusa, gärggusa]

  Adjective - girjak: # MUTTÁK give both -k and -gis attr
    girjak+A+Attr: [girjak, girjagis]
    girjak+A+Sg+Nom: girjak
    girjak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: girjagabbo
    girjak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: girjagamos
    girjak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: girjagappot
    girjak+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: girjagabmusit
    girjak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: girjagappusj
    girjak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: girjagapputjit
    girjak+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: girjagit
    girjak+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [girjakvuohta, girjagisvuohta]

  Adjective - árvas: # TJIEGOS
    árvas+A+Attr: árvas
    árvas+A+Sg+Nom: árvas
    árvas+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: árvvasabbo
    árvas+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: árvvasamos
    árvas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: árvvasappot
    árvas+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: árvvasabmusit
    árvas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: árvvasappusj
    árvas+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: árvvasapputjit
    árvas+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: árvvasit
    árvas+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: árvasvuohta

  Adjective - skárbak: # SKÁRBAK
    skárbak+A+Attr: skárbbis
    skárbak+A+Sg+Nom: skárbak
    skárbak+A+Sg+Acc: skárbagav
    skárbak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: skárbagabbo
    skárbak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: skárbagamos
    skárbak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: skárbagappot
    skárbak+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: skárbagabmusit
    skárbak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: skárbagappusj
    skárbak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: skárbagapputjit
    skárbak+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: skárbagit
    skárbak+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: skárbbisvuohta

  Adjective - gassak: # ALLAK  even syll comp
    gassak+A+Attr: gassa
    gassak+A+Sg+Nom: gassak
    gassak+A+Sg+Gen: gassaga
    gassak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gasep, gassagabbo]
    gassak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gasemus, gassagamos]
    gassak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gasebut, gassagappot]
    gassak+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gasemusát, gassagabmusit]
    gassak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [gasebusj, gassagappusj]
    gassak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gasebuttjat, gassagapputjit]
    gassak+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gassagit
    gassak+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gassavuohta
